Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1611
Public employees; wages withheld; payment to insurance company; warrants.

The sum so withheld from an employee's salary or wages, together with the sums so withheld from the wages or salaries of all other employees participating voluntarily in such group, franchise, or wholesale plan of insurance for a specific group of employees, shall be paid to the insurance company or employees association, designated in the orders, in a lump sum each month; and the appropriate public officer who issues the warrants in payment of the wages or salary of public employees participating voluntarily in such group, franchise, or wholesale plan of insurance is authorized to issue warrants to the appropriate insurance carrier or carriers or employees association, each month, for the composite amounts of the sums so withheld, upon the filing with, and allowance by, the officer or body whose duty it is to approve and allow claims or vouchers for money due and owing from the state, any political subdivision, municipal corporation, public body or agency.

Laws 1949, c. 132, § 4, p. 347.